engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.dic
අකාර/6,19,128,736,1310
අකුර/1,4,8,17,18,24,57,77,87,91,514,623,736,1686,3905
අටසිය/21,983
අනෙක/2,4,6,20,28,36,123,139,149,153,179,193,247,629,1347
අරුත/1,4,6,8,18,25,28,444,745,1570,4363
අර්ධ/3,10,14,68,740,4362,4761,4762,4763
අහවර/453,736
ඇදුණ/2,20,24,47,132,326,1484,1736,2048,4420,4537,4739
උගුර/2,4,24,736,1309,1478
උගුල්/29,383
එරෙන/43,73,3119
එවැන්නක/1,6,16,22,24,1347,2726
ඔයිට/5,284,4364
කඩවත/6,12,17,745,4363
කවුන්ටරය/2,975
කසාය/983
කළෙක/24,346,1347
කියුබා/10,38,39,45,58,88,98,145,1502,1735,1901,2053,4721
කිරණ/3,4,5,18,857
කිරි/5,7,13,26,29,31,50,67,69,81,118,142,200,205,299,321,403,458,572,698,939,1492,1602,1718,2035,2458,2469,3117,3196,3241,3332,3463,3652,4206
කිහිර/1310
කෙරුණ/1,2,4,5,11,16,20,24,28,291,1484,1736,4537,4739
කොම්පැණිය/47,975
ගෑවට/180
ගෙවන/20,24,37,43,51,53,65,73,192,282,373,427,446,521,550,676,1267,1472
ඩෝග්/383
තැබිය/1176
දන්න/1,2,10,20,37,41,47,57,145,174,323,592,635,818,1071,1244,1277,1305,2388,3045,3073,3931,4322
දල්ලු/495
දිනමිණට/5,180
දෙල්/26,260,383,1348
නියෝග/3,14,15,19,23,29,44,64,1534,2598,4929,4930
නිශ්පාදනය/4,975
නුදුරු/10,495
නොකට/1005
නොනැවතුණ/1736
නොපා/13,33,829,3621
නොසැලකිය/1988
පන්සිය/3,4,14,17,23,40,44,48,56,983
පල්ලි/3,14,15,19,26,40,44,48,237,939
පිළිගන්න/142,2395,3077,4322
පෙම්වතා/1,5,102,375,1252,1607
පොලීසිය/1,2,5,8,47,975
බුරුම/3,15,19,23,702,1682
බූදල්/3,383
මයික්‍රපෝනය/975
මයින/9,20,70,79,84,193,257,2018
මැණික/2,4,6,20,110,528,1347,1585,4509
මෙට්ට/3,4364
යෙහි/49,939
රටෙක/16,22,346,963,1347
රැලි/3,14,19,23,29,44,68,255,939
රැළි/3,14,15,19,26,40,44,48,56,68,211,255,939,4525
රීම්/383
ලිහිල්/10,264,383
වනත්/383
වන්න/1,2,4,6,9,16,20,28,30,41,42,47,52,70,79,114,116,129,132,133,166,174,186,187,215,216,234,257,342,433,438,484,765,818,1154,1243,1244,1266,2259,3119,3778
වලසා/102,234,305,1029,1607
වළක්වාලීමට/5,180
වළාවට/180
වැස්ම/2,4,17,3118
විකට/49,4364
විශ්වවිද්‍යාලය/1,2,3,8,14,15,19,23,26,27,32,40,42,44,56,64,129,168,210,975,1089
වෙළෙඳපොලට/180
ව්‍යාධිය/8,975
සංයෝග/3,4,14,15,19,23,26,29,40,48,121,232,1534,2598
සංහාරය/1,4,21,975
සහල්/26,46,383
සාදා/1901,3388
සැන්/383,1531
සිනමා/38,39,45,58,183,191,261,391,408,672,782,889,890,1446,1901,1943,2501,3414
සුමන/20,343,359,412,455,519,543,588,787,894,1055,1280,1417,1472,1773,2105
සුරත/1,2,18,20,36,62,161,169,227,401,1155,1177,2207,3110,4363
සෙවිල්ලා/819
හන්දිය/1,2,4,8,30,47,89,91,975
හාම්පුතා/1,3,10,12,35,62,84,95,102,134,375,1029,1252,1607
හෙවණ/21,857
ෆර්ත/6,4363
